static/hunspell/15.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX O46 Y 213 # N09 аф.уподоб.+
SFX O46 0 ның .	+Gen
SFX O46 0 ға .	+Dat
SFX O46 0 ны .	+Acc
SFX O46 0 нан .	+Abl
SFX O46 0 ла .	+Loc
SFX O46 0 ныңмы .	+Gen+Q
SFX O46 0 ғамы .	+Dat+Q
SFX O46 0 нымы .	+Acc+Q
SFX O46 0 нанмы .	+Abl+Q
SFX O46 0 ламы .	+Loc+Q
SFX O46 0 ныңдыр .	+Gen+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғалыр .	+Dat+Indf
SFX O46 0 нылыр .	+Acc+Indf
SFX O46 0 нандыр .	+Abl+Indf
SFX O46 0 лалыр .	+Loc+Indf
SFX O46 0 ныңсы .	+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ғасы .	+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 нысы .	+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 нансы .	+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ласы .	+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 мын .	+Pred1Sg
SFX O46 0 һың .	+Pred2Sg
SFX O46 0 быҙ .	+Pred1Pl
SFX O46 0 һығыҙ .	+Pred2Pl
SFX O46 0 мынмы .	+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX O46 0 һыңмы .	+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX O46 0 быҙмы .	+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX O46 0 һығыҙмы .	+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX O46 0 мындыр .	+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX O46 0 һыңдыр .	+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙыр .	+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX O46 0 һығыҙҙыр .	+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX O46 0 мынсы .	+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һыңсы .	+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 быҙсы .	+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һығыҙсы .	+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 м .	+PxSg1
SFX O46 0 ң .	+PxSg2
SFX O46 0 һы .	+PxSg3
SFX O46 0 быҙ .	+PxPl1
SFX O46 0 ғыҙ .	+PxPl2
SFX O46 0 мдың .	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX O46 0 ңдың .	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX O46 0 һының .	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX O46 0 быҙҙың .	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙың .	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX O46 0 ма .	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX O46 0 ңа .	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX O46 0 һына .	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX O46 0 быҙға .	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX O46 0 ғыҙға .	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX O46 0 мды .	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX O46 0 ңды .	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX O46 0 һын .	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX O46 0 быҙҙы .	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙы .	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX O46 0 мдан .	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX O46 0 ңдан .	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX O46 0 һынан .	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX O46 0 быҙҙан .	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙан .	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX O46 0 мда .	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX O46 0 ңда .	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX O46 0 һында .	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX O46 0 быҙҙа .	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙа .	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX O46 0 мдыңмы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX O46 0 ңдыңмы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX O46 0 һыныңмы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX O46 0 быҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX O46 0 мамы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX O46 0 ңамы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX O46 0 һынамы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX O46 0 быҙғамы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX O46 0 ғыҙғамы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX O46 0 мдымы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX O46 0 ңдымы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX O46 0 һынмы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX O46 0 быҙҙымы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙымы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX O46 0 мданмы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX O46 0 ңданмы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX O46 0 һынанмы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX O46 0 быҙҙанмы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙанмы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX O46 0 мдамы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX O46 0 ңдамы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX O46 0 һындамы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX O46 0 быҙҙамы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙамы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX O46 0 мдыңмылыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдыңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 һыныңмылыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 мамылыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңамылыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 һынамылыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙғамылыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙғамылыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдымылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдымылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 һынмылыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 мданмылыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңданмылыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 һынанмылыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдамылыр .	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдамылыр .	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 һындамылыр .	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдыңдыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдыңдыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX O46 0 һыныңдыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX O46 0 малыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңалыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX O46 0 һыналыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙғалыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙғалыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX O46 0 һындыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдандыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдандыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX O46 0 һынандыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙандыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙандыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдалыр .	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдалыр .	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX O46 0 һындалыр .	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙалыр .	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙалыр .	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдыңсы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ңдыңсы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һыныңсы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 быҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 масы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ңасы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һынасы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 быҙғасы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ғыҙғасы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 мдысы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ңдысы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һынсы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 быҙҙысы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙысы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 мдансы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ңдансы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һынансы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 быҙҙансы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙансы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 мдасы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ңдасы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һындасы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 быҙҙасы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙасы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ммы .	+PxSg1+Q
SFX O46 0 ңмы .	+PxSg2+Q
SFX O46 0 һымы .	+PxSg3+Q
SFX O46 0 быҙмы .	+PxPl1+Q
SFX O46 0 ғыҙмы .	+PxPl2+Q
SFX O46 0 ммылыр .	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 һымылыр .	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O46 0 мдыр .	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX O46 0 ңдыр .	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX O46 0 һылыр .	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX O46 0 быҙҙыр .	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX O46 0 ғыҙҙыр .	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX O46 0 мсы .	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ңсы .	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 һысы .	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 быҙсы .	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ғыҙсы .	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 мы .	+Q
SFX O46 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX O46 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ныҡы .	+Poss
SFX O46 0 ныҡының .	+Poss+Gen
SFX O46 0 ныҡыға .	+Poss+Dat
SFX O46 0 ныҡыны .	+Poss+Acc
SFX O46 0 ныҡынан .	+Poss+Abl
SFX O46 0 ныҡында .	+Poss+Loc
SFX O46 0 ныҡыныңмы .	+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O46 0 ныҡынамы .	+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O46 0 ныҡынмы .	+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O46 0 ныҡынанмы .	+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O46 0 ныҡындамы .	+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O46 0 ныҡыныңдыр .	+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O46 0 ныҡыналыр .	+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O46 0 ныҡындыр .	+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O46 0 ныҡынандыр .	+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O46 0 ныҡындалыр .	+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O46 0 ныҡыныңсы .	+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ныҡынасы .	+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ныҡынсы .	+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ныҡынансы .	+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ныҡындасы .	+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O46 0 ныҡымы .	+Poss+Q
SFX O46 0 ныҡылыр .	+Poss+Indf
SFX O46 0 ныҡысы .	+Poss+Clt/сы
